Utah statutes.
17-52-205.   Voter information pamphlet.

(1)  In anticipation of an election under Section 17-52-206, the county clerk may prepare a voter information pamphlet to inform the public of the proposed optional plan.

(2)  In preparing a voter information pamphlet under this section, the county clerk may:

(a)  allow proponents and opponents of the proposed optional plan to provide written statements to be included in the pamphlet; and

(b)  use as a guideline the provisions of Title 20A, Chapter 7, Part 7, Voter Information Pamphlet.

(3)  Each county clerk preparing a voter information pamphlet under this section shall cause the publication and distribution of the pamphlet in a manner determined by the county clerk to be adequate.



Amended by Chapter 241, 2001 General Session

